Maine, session 132, LD173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §13056, sub-§2, ¶G, as amended by PL 2013, c. 408, §24, is
further amended to read:
G. A motorboat used exclusively for racing purposes that displays on its hull in a
prominent manner a valid boat number issued by a recognized racing association; and
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §13056, sub-§2, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 408, §25, is
amended to read:
H. A motorboat participating in an event as permitted by section 13061.; and
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §13056, sub-§2, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. A canoe, kayak or rowboat that is equipped with a motor having a manufacturer's
horsepower rating less than 100 horsepower.